California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
 within the limits of the assessment district, without regard to the omitted lots or parcels of land. If the city declares in the resolution of intention that the lots or parcels of land, or any of them, shall be included in the assessment, or if no declaration is made respecting the lots or parcels of land, or any of them, the city shall be liable for the sums thereafter assessed against the lots or parcels of land, and the sums shall be payable by the city out of the general fund unless the city council, in its resolution of intention, designates another fund. However, sums that may be assessed against those lots or parcels of land shall not be payable by the city when those sums are paid by the owner of or the governing body controlling the lots or parcels of land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 53.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Authority to Maintain and Service [18030. - 18034.]

18030.

Whenever in the opinion of the city council of any city the public interest or convenience may require, that body may do one or more of the following:

(a) Order any street lighting system to be maintained in or along the whole or any part of any one or more of the streets in such city.

(b) Order electric current or energy, gas, or other illuminating agent to be furnished for such street lighting system.

For any of the purposes expressed in subdivision (a) or (b) of this section, the city council may determine and declare the district to be benefited by any such improvement and fix the exterior boundaries thereof and assess, either partly or wholly, the costs and expenses (including all incidental expenses) of such improvement, or of any one or more of the items thereof, upon the lands in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18031.

The city shall not be limited by the provisions of this part to the maintenance or servicing of street lighting systems, or any part thereof, owned only by the city, but the city council may also order such maintenance or service to be furnished upon street lighting systems provided and installed or to be installed by, and remaining the property of, any public utility, public corporation, or other person with whom a contract is entered into for such maintenance or service and may assess the costs and expenses of such maintenance, service, or installation in accordance with the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

18032.

If there is more than one street lighting system in any city any or all of such systems may be consolidated and improved under one proceeding. In such case the consolidated system shall be zoned so that those systems of approximately the same general type are grouped together.

In any district wherein zones have been established under this part and where subsequent to such establishment, improvements are made to portions of the lighting system in any zone which are of the same general type as in other existing zones within the district, the portion of the zone which has been so improved may be transferred to a zone with a lighting system of the same general type pursuant to the same procedure of resolution, notice and hearing as are applicable under this chapter for the formation of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

18033.

Whenever a street lighting system is installed along a boundary line or street of any city, the city council may, by resolution, assess the land abutting upon such boundary line or street for the estimated cost and expense of improving the system, even though the system is partially or entirely without the boundaries of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 620.)
-------------------------------------------

18034.

If land has been assessed pursuant to Section 18033, the city council may proceed in all respects in connection therewith as though the street lighting system were entirely within the city limits; except that the city council may enter into a contract with the legislative body of the city or county having jurisdiction over the adjoining territory either to improve all or any portion of the street lighting system, or to have all or any portion of the system improved by the legislative body of the adjoining territory. The legislative body contracting to furnish such improvement may enter into any contract or issue any purchase order authorized in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 620.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The Preliminary Report [18040. - 18042.]

18040.

The city council shall, prior to the passage of the resolution of intention, order the board, commission or officer of the city having charge and control of the maintenance or servicing of street lighting systems or any competent person employed by the city for that purpose, as the city council may name in the order, and direct such board, commission, officer or person to make and file with the city clerk a report in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18041.

Such report shall contain the following:

(a) Plans and specifications which shall set out, among other things, the general type of street lighting system in each zone. The lighting systems to be improved shall be divided into zones and in each zone shall be grouped those systems of approximately the same general type. It shall be sufficient description of the location of the lights to be improved if such plans or specifications show or describe the approximate location of the lights.

(b) An estimate of the cost of the improvement, for the period of time during which it is proposed to be continued.

(c) A diagram showing the proposed assessment district and also the boundaries and dimensions of the respective lots or parcels of land within the district, each of which lots or parcels shall be given a separate number upon the diagram. The diagram shall govern for all details as to the extent of the proposed assessment district.

(d) A proposed assessment of the total amount of the costs and expenses of the proposed improvement upon the several lots or parcels of land in the assessment district in proportion to the estimated benefits to be received by such lots or parcels, respectively, from said improvement. If any portion or percentage of the costs and expenses of such proposed improvement is ordered to be paid out of the city treasury, the amount of such portion or percentage shall first be deducted from the total estimated cost and expense of such improvement, and the assessment proposed in the report shall include only the remainder of the estimated costs and expenses. The proposed assessment shall refer to such lots or parcels upon the diagram by the respective numbers thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 854.)
-------------------------------------------

18042.

When the report is filed with him the clerk shall present it to the city council for consideration, and that body may modify it in any respect, and in case of any such modification, the report as modified shall stand as the report for the purpose of all subsequent proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. The Resolution of Intention [18060. - 18062.]

18060.

After the report is considered by it, the city council may pass a resolution of intention to order the improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18061.

The resolution of intention:

(a) Shall briefly describe the proposed improvement.

(b) Shall describe, in writing or by reference to the diagram referred to in Section 18041 with any modifications required by the city council, the boundaries of the assessment district.

(c) May order that a certain portion or percentage of the costs and expenses of the improvement, the amount of which portion or percentage shall be specified in the resolution, shall be paid out of the city treasury from any fund the city council may designate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1234, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

18062.

The city council shall, in the resolution of intention, provide that the improvement of the street lighting system shall be for a period of time stated in the resolution of intention. The dates of commencement and ending of that period shall be fixed by the city council on or before the date of execution of any contract as provided in this part, or, in the event that no contract is let and the maintenance or servicing is furnished by the city, those dates shall be fixed by the city council on or before the date of ordering the maintenance or servicing by the city. The city council may subsequently postpone the dates of commencement and ending of the period for a reasonable time upon good and sufficient reason appearing therefor and may, in any advertisement for bids and in any contract entered into, reserve the right to make such postponement for such reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 620.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Protest and Hearing [18070. - 18077.]

18070.

(a) After the adoption of the resolution of intention, the city council shall direct the clerk to give notice and set the time and date for a public meeting and public hearing pursuant to Section 54954.6 of the Government Code.

(b) If assessments are to be levied as contemplated by Section 18041, then the notice procedures shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18074.

(a) Any person interested who objects to the proposed improvement may file a written protest, stating his or her objections, with the clerk at or before the hour set for the hearing of protests. The clerk shall indorse on every protest the date and time of its reception by him or her, and at the time appointed for the hearing shall present to the governing body all protests so filed.

(b) If assessments are to be levied, the protest procedures shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18075.

The city council shall hear, consider, and pass upon the protests against the proposed improvement at the time appointed, or at any time to which the hearings may be adjourned, and its decision on all matters of protest shall be final and conclusive. If those protests are sustained, the proceedings shall be abandoned but may be renewed at any time. If those protests are denied or if no protests are filed the proposed assessment as the same shall have been modified or corrected shall be confirmed, and the city council shall thereupon acquire jurisdiction to proceed with the improvement and may by resolution order the proposed improvement to be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18076.

If there is a majority protest by the landowners in any zone to the improvement in that zone, or if the officer or person designated reports that it is practical to subdivide a zone and a majority of the landowners in that subdivided zone protest the improvement in that subdivided zone, the city council shall strike that zone or subdivided zone from the proceedings and correct the proposed assessment accordingly, unless that body, by a four-fifths affirmative vote of all its members finds that the public interest and convenience require that street lights in that zone or subdivided zone be improved. The determination of the city council shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18077.

If a zone or subdivided zone is struck from the proceedings, the city council may proceed the same as though that zone or subdivided zone was not a part of the original proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 620.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Annexation of Additional Lands [18080. - 18084.]

18080.

Whenever in the opinion of the city council of any city the public interest or convenience may require that body to order the improvement of any street lighting system located on lands in the city outside the boundaries of a district established under the provisions of this part, whether or not such lands are contiguous to the boundaries of such established district, that body may, in lieu of establishing a new district under this part, order the annexation of such lands to an existing district established under this part and may assess, either partly or wholly, the costs and expenses, including all incidental expenses of such improvement, or of any one or more of the items thereof, upon the lands in the district, including the lands thus annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 853.)
-------------------------------------------

18081.

The procedures applicable to such annexation and the lands so annexed shall, except as otherwise in this chapter expressly provided, be the same as those applicable to the establishment of the district and to the administration of such established district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 853.)
-------------------------------------------

18082.

The improvement of the street lighting system within the lands so annexed shall be for a period of time not longer than that fixed for the improvement ordered to be made within the established district to which such lands are annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 853.)
-------------------------------------------

18083.

The term of the contract to be let for making the improvement within the lands so annexed shall be for such period of time as will cause such contract to expire or terminate on the same date as the contract let for the improvement to be made in the district as originally established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 853.)
-------------------------------------------

18084.

In the event that an ordinance requires the installation of a street lighting system by a subdivider, the resolution of intention may state that the territory owned by the subdivider comes under the terms of such ordinance and order that such territory, without notice and hearing, be formed into a district, or annexed to an existing district, established under the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 388.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Levying and Collecting the Assessment [18090. - 18099.]

18090.

After acquiring jurisdiction to proceed with the improvement, the city council shall levy the assessment for the portion or percentage required to pay for the improvement for the period of time beginning with the date of commencement of the improvement fixed by the city council and ending, as determined by and at the discretion of the city council either with the close of one 12-month period thereafter or with the close of the current or of the following fiscal year, upon all the respective lots or parcels of land in the assessment district. Thereafter during the period of time provided in the resolution of intention, the city council shall, on or before the beginning of the next succeeding 12-month period or the following fiscal year, levy in like manner and on the same lots or parcels of land the assessment for the portion or percentage required to pay for such improvement for such year, and said board, commission, or officer of the city authorized therefor shall, on or before 60 days prior to the commencement of each such period make and file with the city council a report in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18091.

Such report shall contain:

(a) An estimate of the cost and expense of the improvement for the ensuing 12-month period or the ensuing fiscal year.

(b) A diagram showing the assessment district referred to in the resolution of intention, also the boundaries and dimensions of the respective lots or parcels of land within the district as it existed at the time of the making of the last mentioned diagram, each of which lots or parcels shall be given a separate number on the diagram.

(c) A schedule showing the proportionate amount of the assessment to be charged in proportion to the benefits to be received by each lot or parcel shown on the diagram required by subdivision (b) of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18092.

Any surplus assessments collected shall be applied by the city council to reduce the assessment to be levied either for the next ensuing contract year or for the last contract year under the proceedings, and for the latter purpose such surplus may be permitted to accumulate in the assessment fund. Such reductions shall be made as nearly as possible to the zones or subdivided zones from which such surplus assessments were collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 620.)
-------------------------------------------

18092.1.

If there is any surplus remaining at the close of the last contract year under any proceedings, such surplus shall be used as follows:

(a) If new proceedings are started within one year after the close of the last contract year, such surplus shall be applied toward a reduction of the first installment of the new assessment. Such part of the surplus as was collected from each zone or subdivided zone shall be applied to reduce the installment levied against that zone or subdivided zone.

(b) If new proceedings are not started within the one-year period or if one or more zones or subdivided zones are omitted for any reason from the new proceedings any such surplus or the surplus attributable to such omitted zones or subdivided zones shall become and remain a part of the general funds of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 620.)
-------------------------------------------

18093.

If for any reason there is a deficiency in the funds derived from the assessment for any improvement, including all incidental expenses thereof, the city council may meet such deficiency by an appropriation out of the general fund of the city or by ordering a supplemental assessment in the same manner as nearly as may be as the first assessment, except that protests may only be made against such supplemental assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18094.

Upon the levying of any assessment, the city clerk shall transmit the diagram and assessment upon which such levy is based, or a certified copy of said diagram and assessment to the city tax collector or to such other city officer or employee as the city council designates in the resolution levying the assessment or in case the city has adopted a method for collection of taxes by county officers then to the county tax collector, and such county tax collector shall have full power to perform the duties required in this part of the city tax collector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18095.

The validity of any assessment levied under this part shall not be contested in any action or proceeding unless such action or proceeding is commenced within 30 days after the time the assessment is levied, and any appeal from a final judgment in such an action or proceeding shall be perfected within 30 days after the entry of such judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18096.

Upon the receipt of the diagram and assessment or a certified copy thereof, the tax collector shall record them in a suitable book to be kept for that purpose, and append thereto his certificate of the date of such recording. Such record shall be the assessment roll. From the date of such recording all persons shall be deemed to have notice of the contents of such assessment roll. Immediately upon such recording, the several assessments contained in such assessment roll shall become due and payable, and each of such assessments shall be a lien upon the land against which it is made, and shall only be discharged by payment of the assessment or by redemption of the land after sale for delinquency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

18097.

The tax collector shall, upon the recording of such diagram and assessment, give notice by publication for five days in a daily newspaper, published and circulated in the city, or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper so published and circulated, that the diagram and assessment has been recorded in his office and that all sums assessed therein are due and payable immediately, and that payment of said sums shall be made to him within 30 days after the date of the first publication or posting, which date shall be stated in the notice. The notice shall also contain the statement that all assessments not paid before the expiration of the said 30 days shall be delinquent, and thereupon 5 per cent of the amount of each such assessment shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18098.

When payment of any assessment is made, the tax collector shall mark opposite such assessment the word “paid,” with the date of the payment thereof, and shall give a receipt therefor. Upon the expiration of said period of 30 days, all assessments then unpaid shall become delinquent, and the tax collector shall mark each such assessment “delinquent,” and shall add 5 per cent to the amount thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18099.

The lien shall be subordinate to all fixed special assessment liens previously imposed upon the same property, but it shall have priority over all fixed special assessment liens which may thereafter be created against the property. A supplemental assessment is a new assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Sale and Redemption of Delinquent Property [18120. - 18131.]

18120.

The tax collector shall, within 30 days after the date of delinquency, begin the publication of a notice of sale of the land upon which the assessments have not been paid, which publication shall be made by two insertions in a daily or weekly newspaper published and circulated in the city. The dates fixed for the sale of such land shall be not less than five days nor more than 10 days after the last publication of said notice of sale, or after the completion of posting, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18121.

The notice of sale so published shall contain a description sufficient to identify each lot or parcel of land delinquent, and opposite each description the name of its owner, if known, otherwise designating him as unknown, and the amount of the assessment and costs due, including the cost of advertisement, which cost of advertisement shall not exceed the sum of fifty cents ($0.50) for each lot or parcel of land separately assessed. The tax collector shall append to and publish with the notice of sale a notice that unless each delinquent assessment, together with the penalties and costs thereon, is paid, the land upon which the assessment is a lien will be sold at public auction, at a time and place to be specified in the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18122.

At any time after such delinquency and prior to the sale of any lots or parcels of land assessed and delinquent, any person may pay the assessment thereon, together with the penalties and costs due thereon, including the cost of advertising, if such payment is made after the first publication of notice of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18123.

At the time and place fixed in the notice of sale the tax collector shall proceed with such sale, commencing at the head of the list of lands contained in such notice and continuing in the numerical order thereof until all the land is sold, except that he may postpone or continue the sale from day to day until the sale is completed. The tax collector shall separately sell each lot or parcel of land described in such notice, or so much thereof as is necessary to realize the amount assessed against the lot or parcel together with the penalties and costs, and fifty cents ($0.50) for a certificate of sale. If there is no other purchaser the lot or parcel shall be struck off to the city as purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18124.

The tax collector shall issue for each sale an original and duplicate certificate of sale, referring to the proceedings, describing the lot or parcel of land sold, and giving the name of the purchaser and the amount for which the lot or parcel was sold. He shall deliver the original certificate to the purchaser, and he shall keep the duplicate on file in his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18125.

At any time after the date of sale and prior to the issuance and delivery of a deed to the land sold, any land sold under the provisions of this chapter may be redeemed by the payment to the tax collector of the amount for which the land was sold, with an additional penalty of 1 per cent per month of said amount together with such other penalties as may be payable as provided in this chapter. Said 1 per cent penalties shall be added on the first day of each month following the date of the sale of the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18126.

The redemption money shall be paid by the tax collector to the person holding the original certificate of sale upon his delivering up such certificate and receipting for the amount received from the tax collector therefor. Upon redemption of any lot or parcel of land the tax collector shall enter the fact and date of such redemption upon the duplicate certificate of sale thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18127.

At any time after the expiration of 12 months from the date of sale, the tax collector shall execute to the purchaser, or his assignee, on his application, if such purchaser or assignee has complied with the provisions of this chapter a deed of the land sold, in which shall be recited substantially the matters contained in the certificate, also any assignment thereof and the fact that no person has redeemed the land. The tax collector shall receive from the applicant for a deed one dollar ($1) for making such deed, unless the city is the purchaser, in which case no charge shall be made therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18128.

The purchaser or his assignee shall, at least 30 days before he applies for a deed, serve upon the owner of the land, and upon the occupant of the land if it is occupied, a written notice setting forth:

(a) A description of the land.

(b) That the land has been sold for a delinquent assessment (specifying the improvement for which the assessment was made).

(c) The amount for which the land was sold.

(d) The amount necessary to redeem at the time of giving notice.

(e) The date when such purchaser or assignee will apply to the tax collector for a deed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18129.

If the owner can not be found, after due diligence, the notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place upon the land at least 30 days before the date stated therein, at which the application for a deed will be made. The person applying for a deed shall file with the tax collector an affidavit showing that notice of such application has been given, as required, and if the notice was not served on the owner of the land personally, that due diligence was used to find the owner. The tax collector shall receive and file such affidavit in his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18130.

If redemption of the land is made after such affidavit is filed, and more than 11 months from the date of sale, the person making such redemption shall pay, in addition to the other amounts required, three dollars ($3) for the service of notice and the making of such affidavit, which amount shall be paid over to the purchaser or his assignee in the same manner as other sums paid for redemption. No deed for any land sold for delinquent assessments shall be delivered by the tax collector until the purchaser or his assignee has complied with all the provisions of this chapter and filed the proper affidavit with the tax collector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18131.

The deed of the tax collector shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all matters recited therein, and of the regularity of all proceedings prior to the execution thereof, and of title in the grantee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Alternative Procedure for Installment Assessments [18150. - 18155.]

18150.

The procedure in this chapter shall be an alternative procedure to that provided in other sections of this part, and the city council may use this procedure or not, in its discretion, and when used the period for which the work is to be done shall be upon a fiscal year basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18151.

When the assessment has been adopted and confirmed, as provided in Section 18075, the city clerk shall transmit the report, diagram and assessment, or a certified copy thereof, as finally adopted and confirmed to the city auditor, who shall record the same and thereafter enter on the assessment roll for general city taxes next coming due, opposite each lot or parcel of land affected, in a space marked “street lighting assessment” or other suitable designation, the assessment coming due thereon during the fiscal year covered by the assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18152.

Assessments coming due under this procedure in any year during the period of time stated in the resolution of intention shall be payable in annual or semiannual installments, accordingly as the general city taxes are payable in annual or semiannual installments, and shall be payable and become delinquent at the same times and in the same proportionate amounts and bear the same proportionate penalties and interest after delinquency as general city taxes. Property securing such assessments shall be sold after delinquency in the same manner as property is sold for delinquent general city taxes, and shall be subject to redemption in the same manner as property is redeemable from sale for delinquent general city taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18153.

The city may be the purchaser at any delinquent sale under this chapter in like manner as it may become the purchaser of property sold for delinquent general city taxes, and when the city becomes the purchaser it shall transfer into the special fund devoted to the improvement the amount of the delinquent assessment, penalties and interest then due thereon. In cases where under the law the city is not always the purchaser at sales for delinquent general city taxes, the city shall become the purchaser at any delinquent sale under this chapter if there is no other purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18154.

When the city becomes the purchaser the land shall not again be sold for any succeeding delinquent assessment, penalties and interest until it has been redeemed from the previous sale. The city shall, however, unless a resale has been made by it, from time to time when due transfer into said special fund, pending redemption, the amount of any succeeding delinquent assessment, penalties and interest. No redemption shall be made until all delinquent assessments, penalties and interest are paid. The purchaser at any delinquent sale, or at any resale by the city if the city was the purchaser, shall take the land subject to all unpaid assessments, penalties and interest due under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18155.

If the procedure provided for in this chapter is adopted and the duties of assessing property and collecting city taxes are performed for the city by the county assessor and the county tax collector, in the manner provided by law, a certified copy of the diagram and assessment shall be filed with the county auditor on or before the tenth day of August. In each such diagram and assessment so filed with the county auditor, the descriptions of the properties reported shall be the descriptions used for the same properties on the map books of the county assessor for the then current year. The county auditor shall enter the amounts of the respective assessments on the county tax roll opposite the respective parcels of land and thereafter the said amounts shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes are collected and all laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of county taxes shall be and are hereby made applicable to such special assessment taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.5. Alternative Procedure for Levying and Collecting Assessments on ad Valorem Basis [18160. - 18169.]

18160.

The procedure in this chapter shall be an alternative procedure for levying and collecting assessments, and the city council may by resolution determine, in its discretion, that this procedure shall be followed. Such determination may be made, with respect to the procedures governing the organization of the district, at the time when the city council shall order the making and filing of a report as provided in Section 18040. Such determination may be made in any succeeding year during the period of time for which the improvement is ordered to be continued, at least 60 days prior to the making of the general tax levy for city purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

18161.

In the event that the city council shall determine to follow the procedure provided in this chapter with respect to the organization of the district, the report shall omit the diagram and proposed assessment referred to in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 18041, but the plans and specifications referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 18041 shall include or be accompanied by a map or plat of the district, showing the lands, including all zones thereof, if any, to be benefited by the proposed improvement and to be assessed to pay the expenses thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

18162.

In the event that the city council shall determine to follow the procedure provided in this chapter with respect to the organization of the district, the resolution ordering the proposed improvement as contemplated by Section 18075 shall:

(a) Describe, in writing or by reference to the map or plat referred to in Section 18161 with any modifications required by the city council, the boundaries of the district, and of any zone included therein, as they may be finally established, and designate the district and each zone therein by name, number or other distinctive method;

(b) State the period of time for which the proposed improvement shall continue and, in the event the maintenance and servicing is to be furnished by the city, the dates of commencement and ending of such period;

(c) Describe briefly the proposed improvement, stating its estimated cost for the first year, and order the proposed improvement to be made;

(d) Specify what portions of the estimated cost for the first year shall be borne by the city and the district respectively, if less than the entire cost is to be borne by the district, and designate the fund to be charged with such cost; 

(e) Specify what proportion of the estimated cost for the first year to be borne by the district shall be borne by each zone therein;

(f) Order that portion of the estimated cost proposed to be borne by the district, and by each zone therein, to be paid by special assessment taxes levied upon all the lands, exclusive of improvements, within the district and any zone therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

18163.

A certified copy of the resolution ordering the proposed improvement and the map or plat of the district referred to in Section 18161 shall be filed with each assessor whose roll is used for the levy, and with the State Board of Equalization. Compliance with this section shall be sufficient to meet the requirements of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5, of the Government Code. The map or plat shall show the precise location of the boundaries of the district and any zones thereof, and shall contain such information and data necessary to locate and retrace any and all such boundary lines, or shall be accompanied by a statement setting forth a legal description of such boundaries. Thereafter the assessor in making up the city assessment roll shall segregate the property included within the district on the assessment roll under the district designation contained in the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 655.)
-------------------------------------------

18164.

Each year during the period of time for which the improvement is to continue, and not less than 30 days prior to the making of the general tax levy for city purposes, the board, commission, officer or person designated pursuant to the provisions of Section 18040 shall furnish to the city council an estimate of the costs of the improvement for the next year. For the first year, the estimate of the cost of the improvement set forth in the resolution ordering the improvement shall be used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

18165.

The city council shall, at the time of making the next general tax levy and in the manner provided for the general tax levy, levy a special assessment tax upon all lands, and may at such time and in such manner levy a special assessment upon all improvements, within the district, and within any zone therein, which will be sufficient to raise that portion of the estimated cost of the improvement for the next year which is to be borne by the district.

The city council shall state in its levy whether the special assessment is upon all land within the district or upon all land and all improvements within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1580.)
-------------------------------------------

18166.
